Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.203

Responsibility of city to maintain county road forming a municipal boundary.

If the centerline of a portion of a county road is part of a corporate boundary of a city or town as of May 21, 1985, and that portion of county road has no connection to the county road system, maintenance of all affected portions of the road shall be the responsibility of such city or town after a petition requesting the same has been made to the city or town by the county legislative authority.

[ 1985 c 429 s 2.]